Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.060

Candidates' names—Nicknames.

When filing for office, a candidate may indicate the manner in which he or she desires his or her name to be printed on the ballot. For filing purposes, a candidate may use a nickname by which he or she is commonly known as his or her first name, but the last name shall be the name under which he or she is registered to vote.

No candidate may:

(1) Use a nickname that denotes present or past occupation, including military rank;

(2) Use a nickname that denotes the candidate's position on issues or political affiliation;

(3) Use a nickname designed intentionally to mislead voters.

[ 2003 c 111 s 606; 1990 c 59 s 83. Formerly RCW 29.15.090.]